Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,106
Interpretation.

Sections 25-12,101 to 25-12,107 shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact them.

Laws 1947, c. 93, § 6, p. 273.

Operation of act is not dependent upon reciprocal law in another state. Abramson v. Abramson, 161 Neb. 782, 74 N.W.2d 919 (1956).